tests/кӗсье.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-optimised-lookup
    Gen: ../chv.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../chv.automorf.hfst

Tests:

  "Сӑмах кӗсье":
    кӗсье<n><nom> :  кӗсье 
    кӗсье<n><gen> :  кӗсьен 
    кӗсье<n><dat> :  кӗсьене 
    кӗсье<n><loc> :  кӗсьере 
    кӗсье<n><abl> :  кӗсьерен 
    кӗсье<n><ins> :  кӗсьепе 
    кӗсье<n><abe> :  кӗсьесӗр 
    кӗсье<n><ben> :  кӗсьешӗн
    кӗсье<n><px1sg><nom> :  кӗсьем 
    кӗсье<n><px1sg><gen> :  кӗсьемӗн 
    кӗсье<n><px1sg><dat> :  кӗсьеме 
    кӗсье<n><px1sg><loc> :  кӗсьемре 
    кӗсье<n><px1sg><abl> :  кӗсьемрен 
    кӗсье<n><px1sg><ins> :  кӗсьемпе 
    кӗсье<n><px1sg><abe> :  кӗсьемсӗр 
    кӗсье<n><px1sg><ben> :  кӗсьемшӗн
    кӗсье<n><px2sg><nom> :  кӗсйӳ 
    кӗсье<n><px2sg><gen> :  кӗсйӳн 
    кӗсье<n><px2sg><dat> :  кӗсйӳне 
    кӗсье<n><px2sg><loc> :  кӗсйӳнте 
    кӗсье<n><px2sg><abl> :  кӗсйӳнтен 
    кӗсье<n><px2sg><ins> :  кӗсйӳпе 
    кӗсье<n><px2sg><abe> :  кӗсйӳсӗр 
    кӗсье<n><px2sg><ben> :  кӗсйӳшӗн
    кӗсье<n><px3sp><nom> :  кӗсйи 
    кӗсье<n><px3sp><gen> :  кӗсйин 
    кӗсье<n><px3sp><dat> :  кӗсйине 
    кӗсье<n><px3sp><loc> :  кӗсйинче 
    кӗсье<n><px3sp><abl> :  кӗсйинчен 
    кӗсье<n><px3sp><ins> :  кӗсйипе 
    кӗсье<n><px3sp><abe> :  кӗсйисӗр 
    кӗсье<n><px3sp><ben> :  кӗсйишӗн
    кӗсье<n><px1pl><nom> :  кӗсьемӗр 
    кӗсье<n><px1pl><gen> :  кӗсьемӗрӗн 
    кӗсье<n><px1pl><dat> :  кӗсьемӗре 
    кӗсье<n><px1pl><loc> :  кӗсьемӗрте 
    кӗсье<n><px1pl><abl> :  кӗсьемӗртен 
    кӗсье<n><px1pl><ins> :  кӗсьемӗрпе 
    кӗсье<n><px1pl><abe> :  кӗсьемӗрсӗр 
    кӗсье<n><px1pl><ben> :  кӗсьемӗршӗн
    кӗсье<n><px2pl><nom> :  кӗсйӗр 
    кӗсье<n><px2pl><gen> :  кӗсйӗрӗн 
    кӗсье<n><px2pl><dat> :  кӗсйӗре 
    кӗсье<n><px2pl><loc> :  кӗсйӗрте 
    кӗсье<n><px2pl><abl> :  кӗсйӗртен 
    кӗсье<n><px2pl><ins> :  кӗсйӗрпе 
    кӗсье<n><px2pl><abe> :  кӗсйӗрсӗр 
    кӗсье<n><px2pl><ben> :  кӗсйӗршӗн
    кӗсье<n><pl><nom> :  кӗсьесем 
    кӗсье<n><pl><gen> :  кӗсьесен 
    кӗсье<n><pl><dat> :  кӗсьесене 
    кӗсье<n><pl><loc> :  кӗсьесенче 
    кӗсье<n><pl><abl> :  кӗсьесенчен 
    кӗсье<n><pl><ins> :  кӗсьесемпе 
    кӗсье<n><pl><abe> :  кӗсьесемсӗр 
    кӗсье<n><pl><ben> :  кӗсьесемшӗн
    кӗсье<n><px1sg><pl><nom> :  кӗсьемсем 
    кӗсье<n><px1sg><pl><gen> :  кӗсьемсен 
    кӗсье<n><px1sg><pl><dat> :  кӗсьемсене 
    кӗсье<n><px1sg><pl><loc> :  кӗсьемсенче 
    кӗсье<n><px1sg><pl><abl> :  кӗсьемсенчен 
    кӗсье<n><px1sg><pl><ins> :  кӗсьемсемпе 
    кӗсье<n><px1sg><pl><abe> :  кӗсьемсемсӗр 
    кӗсье<n><px1sg><pl><ben> :  кӗсьемсемшӗн
    кӗсье<n><px2sg><pl><nom> :  кӗсйӳсем 
    кӗсье<n><px2sg><pl><gen> :  кӗсйӳсен 
    кӗсье<n><px2sg><pl><dat> :  кӗсйӳсене 
    кӗсье<n><px2sg><pl><loc> :  кӗсйӳсенче 
    кӗсье<n><px2sg><pl><abl> :  кӗсйӳсенчен 
    кӗсье<n><px2sg><pl><ins> :  кӗсйӳсемпе 
    кӗсье<n><px2sg><pl><abe> :  кӗсйӳсемсӗр 
    кӗсье<n><px2sg><pl><ben> :  кӗсйӳсемшӗн
    кӗсье<n><px3sp><pl><nom> :  кӗсйисем 
    кӗсье<n><px3sp><pl><gen> :  кӗсйисен 
    кӗсье<n><px3sp><pl><dat> :  кӗсйисене 
    кӗсье<n><px3sp><pl><loc> :  кӗсйисенче 
    кӗсье<n><px3sp><pl><abl> :  кӗсйисенчен 
    кӗсье<n><px3sp><pl><ins> :  кӗсйисемпе 
    кӗсье<n><px3sp><pl><abe> :  кӗсйисемсӗр 
    кӗсье<n><px3sp><pl><ben> :  кӗсйисемшӗн
    кӗсье<n><px1pl><pl><nom> :  кӗсьемӗрсем 
    кӗсье<n><px1pl><pl><gen> :  кӗсьемӗрсен 
    кӗсье<n><px1pl><pl><dat> :  кӗсьемӗрсене 
    кӗсье<n><px1pl><pl><loc> :  кӗсьемӗрсенче 
    кӗсье<n><px1pl><pl><abl> :  кӗсьемӗрсенчен 
    кӗсье<n><px1pl><pl><ins> :  кӗсьемӗрсемпе 
    кӗсье<n><px1pl><pl><abe> :  кӗсьемӗрсемсӗр 
    кӗсье<n><px1pl><pl><ben> :  кӗсьемӗрсемшӗн
    кӗсье<n><px2pl><pl><nom> :  кӗсйӗрсем 
    кӗсье<n><px2pl><pl><gen> :  кӗсйӗрсен 
    кӗсье<n><px2pl><pl><dat> :  кӗсйӗрсене 
    кӗсье<n><px2pl><pl><loc> :  кӗсйӗрсенче 
    кӗсье<n><px2pl><pl><abl> :  кӗсйӗрсенчен 
    кӗсье<n><px2pl><pl><ins> :  кӗсйӗрсемпе 
    кӗсье<n><px2pl><pl><abe> :  кӗсйӗрсемсӗр 
    кӗсье<n><px2pl><pl><ben> :  кӗсйӗрсемшӗн
